Arkansas, session 2025, HB1725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 14, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-14-1214. Compensation of sheriffs.
(a) A quorum court shall fix by ordinance the annual salary of the
sheriff as provided under § 14-14-1204 subject to the adjustments provided by
§ 14-14-1210 or otherwise provided by law.
(b) If an individual elected or appointed to the office of sheriff
does not have the training or experience provided under § 14-14-1315(a)(1) or
§ 14-14-1315(a)(2) as documented on the filing required under § 14-14-1315,
the quorum court shall fix by ordinance the annual salary of the sheriff at
the minimum provided by § 14-14-1204, subject to the adjustments provided by
§ 14-14-1210.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 14, Subchapter 13, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
*SSS180*
03/10/2025 8:02:51 AM SSS180

HB1725
14-14-1315. Required documentation for newly elected or appointed
sheriffs.
(a) Within ten (10) days of his or her election or appointment, an
individual elected or appointed to the office of sheriff shall file
documentation with the county clerk that the individual:
(1) Is in compliance with the selection and training
requirements for certification set by and documented by the Arkansas Law
Enforcement Training Academy;
(2) Is eligible to be employed as a law enforcement officer
under § 12-9-112; or
(3) Does not have the training or experience provided under
subdivision (a)(1) or subdivision (a)(2) of this section.
(b) The county clerk shall provide copies of the documentation
required under subsection (a) of this section to the quorum court before the
individual elected or appointed to the office of sheriff takes office.
(c)(1) An individual elected or appointed to the office of sheriff
that subsequently meets the training or experience under subdivision (a)(1)
or subdivision (a)(2) of this section may file documentation of the training
or experience with the county clerk.
(2) The county clerk shall provide copies of the documentation
submitted under subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the quorum court, which
may be considered when the quorum court is determining compensation under §
14-14-1214.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date. This act is effective on
and after December 31, 2026.










03/10/2025 8:02:51 AM SSS180